Utah statutes.
32B-3-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter, "final adjudication" means an adjudication for which a final judgment or order is issued that:

(1)  is not appealed, and the time to appeal the judgment has expired; or

(2)  is appealed, and is affirmed, in whole or in part, on appeal.

